Utah statutes.
20A-7-706.   Copies of arguments to be sent to opposing authors -- Rebuttal arguments.

(1)  When the lieutenant governor has received the arguments for and against a measure to be submitted to the voters, the lieutenant governor shall immediately send copies of the arguments in favor of the measure to the authors of the arguments against and copies of the arguments against to the authors of the arguments in favor.

(2)  The authors may prepare and submit rebuttal arguments not exceeding 250 words.

(3) (a)  The rebuttal arguments shall be filed with the lieutenant governor:

(i)  for constitutional amendments and referendum petitions, not later than the day that falls 120 days before the date of the election; and

(ii)  for initiatives, not later than July 30.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d), the authors may not amend or change the rebuttal arguments after they are submitted to the lieutenant governor.

(c)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(d), the lieutenant governor may not alter the arguments in any way.

(d)  The lieutenant governor and the authors of a rebuttal argument may jointly modify a rebuttal argument after it is submitted if:

(i)  they jointly agree that changes to the rebuttal argument must be made to correct spelling or grammatical errors; and

(ii)  the rebuttal argument has not yet been submitted for typesetting.

(4)  The lieutenant governor shall ensure that:

(a)  rebuttal arguments are printed in the same manner as the direct arguments; and

(b)  each rebuttal argument follows immediately after the direct argument which it seeks to rebut.

